Hawaii statutes.
§457-15 Injunctive relief. The
practice of nursing as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse by
any person who has not been issued a license under this chapter or whose
license has been suspended or revoked or has expired is declared to be inimical
to the public welfare and to constitute a public nuisance. The board of
nursing may, through the attorney general, apply for an injunction in any court
of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any person who has not been issued a
license or whose license has been suspended or revoked or expired, from
practicing nursing as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse; and,
upon the filing of a verified petition in court, the court or any judge
thereof, if satisfied by affidavit, or otherwise, that the person is or has
been practicing nursing as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse
without having been issued a license, or after the person's license has been
suspended or revoked or expired, may issue a temporary injunction, without notice
or bond, enjoining the defendant from further practicing nursing as a
registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse. A copy of the verified
petition shall be served upon the defendant and the proceedings shall
thereafter be conducted as in other civil cases. If it be established that the
defendant has been or is practicing nursing as a registered nurse or as a
licensed practical nurse without having been issued a license or has been or is
practicing nursing as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse after
the defendant's license has been revoked, or expired, the court, or any judge
thereof, may enter a decree perpetually enjoining the defendant from further
practicing nursing as a registered nurse or as a licensed practical nurse. In case
of violation of any injunction issued under this section, the court, or any
judge thereof, may summarily try and punish the offender for contempt of
court. The injunction proceedings shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of,
all penalties and other remedies provided in this chapter. [L 1970, c 71, pt of
§1; am L 1983, c 119, §12]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next